Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 4. State Board of Career and Technical Education.

§ 22.1-227.
Board designated to carry out provisions of federal act.

The Board of Education is designated as the State Board of Career and Technical Education to carry out the provisions of the federal Vocational Education Act of 1963, as amended, and as such shall promote and administer the provision of agriculture, business, marketing, home economics, health, technology education, trade and industrial education in the public middle and high schools, regional schools established pursuant to § 22.1-26, institutions of higher education, and other eligible institutions for youth and adults.

For the purposes of this section, “promote” shall not be construed to mandate the implementation of any additional career and technical education programs that are not currently offered.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-319; 1980, c. 559; 1992, cc. 673, 897; 2001, c. 483.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 2, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any local school board to rename its vocational schools or programs or to require any public or private vocational school to change its name; however, any public school having in its name the terms vocational or vocational technical or any variation of these terms and designated by a local school board to be a vocational or vocational technical school shall comply with the relevant requirements for career and technical education set forth in Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia and the applicable regulations.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 3, provides: “That nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require expenditure of funds to realign any name with the term ‘career and technical education’ or to require any redesigning or reprinting of any logo, stationery, informational material or website. In addition, any stationery, pamphlets or other printed material referring to vocational education or some other term denoting career and technical education requiring an eventual revision of a state program or name may continue to be used in the normal course of business until consumed before being redesigned and reprinted.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4, provides: “That, further, whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term ‘career and technical education.’ ”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any additional services or changes in services in any state or local program or to require any such program to deliver different services than are required by applicable law.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “institutions of higher education” was substituted for “postsecondary institutions” to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “Career and Technical” for “Vocational” in the first paragraph, and substituted “career and technical” for “vocational” in the second paragraph.

§ 22.1-227.01.
Career and technical education defined.

As used in this article,
“career and technical education”
means an organized education program offering a sequence of courses that (i) may incorporate field, laboratory, and classroom instruction; (ii) emphasize career and technical occupational experiences; (iii) are designed to prepare individuals for further education and gainful employment; and (iv) are aligned with state or national program certification and accreditation standards, if such standards exist for the sequence of courses. However, clause (iv) shall not apply to any program offered by industry in cooperation with a local school board.

History.

1996, c. 400; 2001, c. 483; 2015, c. 588.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 deleted “as amended” following “this article,” substituted “career and technical” for “vocational,” substituted “that” for “which” following “of courses,” and substituted “that emphasize career and technical” for “which emphasize.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 588 inserted the clause (i) through (iii) clauses and added clause (iv) and the last sentence.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 22.1-227.1.
Career and technical education.

The Board of Education shall incorporate into career and technical education the Standards of Learning for mathematics, science, English, and social studies, including history, and other subject areas as may be appropriate. The Board may also authorize, in its regulations for accrediting public schools in Virginia, the substitution of industry certification and state licensure examinations for Standards of Learning assessments for the purpose of awarding credit for career and technical education courses, where appropriate.

The Board shall also develop a plan for increasing the number of students receiving industry certification and state licensure as part of their career and technical education. The plan shall include an annual goal for school divisions. Where there is an accepted national industry certification for career and technical education instructional personnel and programs for automotive technology, such certification shall be mandatory.

With such funds as may be appropriated for such purpose, there shall be established, within the Department of Education, a unit of specialists in career and technical education. The unit shall (i) assist in developing and revising local career and technical curriculum to integrate the Standards of Learning, (ii) provide professional development for career and technical instructional personnel to improve the quality of career and technical education, (iii) conduct site visits to the schools providing career and technical education, and (iv) seek the input of business and industry representatives regarding the content and direction of career and technical education programs in the public schools of the Commonwealth.

The Board shall develop guidelines for the establishment of High School to Work Partnerships, hereafter referred to as “Partnerships,” between public high schools and local businesses to create opportunities for high school students to (i) participate in an apprenticeship, internship, or job shadow program in a variety of trades and skilled labor positions or (ii) tour local businesses and meet with owners and employees. These guidelines shall include a model waiver form to be used by high schools and local businesses in connection with Partnership programs to protect both the students and the businesses from liability.Each local school board may establish Partnerships or delegate the authority to establish Partnerships to the local school division’s career and technical education administrator or his designee, in collaboration with the school counselor office of each public high school in the school division, and shall educate high school students about opportunities available through such Partnerships.Students who miss a partial or full day of school while participating in Partnership programs shall not be counted as absent for the purposes of calculating average daily membership, but each local school board shall develop policies and procedures for students to make up missed work and may determine the maximum number of school days per academic year that a student may spend participating in a Partnership program.

History.

1999, cc. 435, 442; 2001, c. 483; 2002, c. 167; 2008, c. 150; 2011, c. 388; 2013, cc. 56, 500; 2016, cc. 720, 750; 2018, cc. 142, 388; 2019, cc. 139, 796.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 167, cl. 2, provides: “That nothing herein shall be construed to restrict or change the authority and discretion of the Board of Education for establishing school accreditation standards and the requirements for obtaining a diploma or to require the Board to authorize the award of verified units of credit for any specific industry certification or state licensure examination.”

Acts 2011, c. 388, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2012, c. 182, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2013, c. 697, provides: “§ 1. The Board of Education shall develop, prior to July 1, 2014, a model waiver form for use by any entity providing a career and technical occupational experience for public secondary school students.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 483 substituted “career and technical” for “vocational” throughout the section.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 167 added the last sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 150 inserted the present second paragraph.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 388, effective July 1, 2012, added the last sentence in the second paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 56 and 500 are identical, and added the subsection A through C designators and subsection D.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 720 and 750 are identical, and deleted “verified units of” preceding “credit for career” in the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 142 and 388 are identical, and in the first paragraph of subsection D, substituted “high school students” for “students who may not seek further education after high school” and rewrote the second paragraph of D, which read “Each local school board may encourage the local school division’s career and technical education administrator or his designee to collaborate with the guidance counselor office of each public high school in the Commonwealth to establish Partnerships and to educate the student body about available opportunities.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 139 and 796 are identical, and substituted “school counselor” for “guidance counselor” in the second paragraph of subsection D.